District of Columbia statutes.
3-301

Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the Congress that the District of Columbia National Guard Armory shall be maintained and operated primarily to provide facilities for the quartering and training of the District of Columbia National Guard, and, secondarily, to provide suitable facilities for major athletic events, conventions, concerts, such other activities as may be in the interest of the District of Columbia, including, but not limited to, the provision of emergency protection when the temperature falls below 32 degrees Fahrenheit, and that such Armory shall be operated as nearly as practicable on a self-supporting basis.

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 339, ch. 418, § 1
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-204, § 3, 36 DCR 454
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(c), (e), 52 DCR 8113
This section is referenced in § 10-1202.02a.
1981 Ed., § 2-301.
1973 Ed., § 2-1701.
D.C. Law 16-35 substituted “such other activities as may be in the interest of the District of Columbia, including, but not limited to, the provision of emergency protection when the temperature falls below 32 degrees Fahrenheit,” for “such other activities as may be in the interest of the District of Columbia,”.
The National Guard, referred to in this section, was substituted for the Militia pursuant to the Act of February 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636.

Construction of Law 7-204

Section 7 of D.C. Law 7-204 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to reduce the rights recognized by subchapter I of Chapter 6 of Title 3 [subchapter I of Chapter 7 of Title 4, 2001 Ed.].

Transfer of nonmilitary functions to Sports Commission: Section 19 of D.C. Law 10-152, provided, in part, that the Sports Commission shall assume all nonmilitary functions of the Armory Board as are set forth in § 2-306 § 3-306, 2001 Ed. and that all references to the Armory Board in subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 2 subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 3, 2001 Ed. are intended to be references to the Sports Commission unless the clear meaning requires otherwise.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-206 amended § 19 of D.C. Law 10-152 by adding (e) and (f) which contain provisions authorizing the Armory Board to exercise its nonmilitary functions and authority on an interim basis and ratifying actions taken during the interim period.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2363, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for the Starplex Fund, $8,717,000 from other funds for expenses incurred by the Armory Board in the exercise of its powers granted by this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter: Provided, That the Mayor shall submit a budget for the Armory Board for the forthcoming fiscal year as required by [§ 47-301(b) § 1-204.42, 2001 Ed.].